Maryland, session 2026, HB0333.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0333*

HOUSE BILL 333
4–101.
Except as to a matter of compelling State interest OR WITH RESPECT TO A
CONFLICT WITH § 4–206 OF THIS TITLE, if any provision of this title relating to party
governance conflicts with the constitution and bylaws of a political party, the constitution
and bylaws shall apply to the extent of the conflict.
4–206.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO THE PROCESS OF FILLING A VACANCY
IN THE OFFICE OF SENATOR OR DELEGATE IN THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY UNDER
ARTICLE III, § 13 OF THE MARYLAND CONSTITUTION.
(B) (1) THE APPLICATION PERIOD TO APPLY TO A CENTRAL COMMITTEE
TO FILL A VACANCY SHALL BE:
(I) OPEN FOR AT LEAST 7 DAYS; AND
(II) ADVERTISED IN A CONSPICUOUS MANNER BY THE CENTRAL
COMMITTEE FILLING THE VACANCY BY A PUBLIC NOTICE THAT INCLUDES:
1. THE CENTRAL COMMITTEE’S INTENT TO MEET TO FILL
THE VACANCY;
2. THE TIME AND PLACE OF ANY MEETINGS TO BE HELD
TO DISCUSS OR VOTE ON THE FILLING OF THE VACANCY;
3. THE PROCESS FOR FILLING THE VACANCY; AND
4. THE MANNER IN WHICH INDIVIDUALS MAY APPLY TO
FILL THE VACANCY.
(2) THE NOTICE REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL BE TRANSLATED INTO A LANGUAGE OTHER THAN ENGLISH IF
THE LOCAL BOARD FOR THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE CENTRAL COMMITTEE IS
LOCATED IS REQUIRED TO TRANSLATE ELECTION MATERIALS INTO THAT LANGUAGE
UNDER § 203 OF THE FEDERAL VOTING RIGHTS ACT.
(C) (1) ALL APPLICATIONS SUBMITTED TO A CENTRAL COMMITTEE TO
FILL A VACANCY SHALL:
(I) BE POSTED ONLINE PROMPTLY AFTER THE APPLICATION
DEADLINE BY THE COUNTY CENTRAL COMMITTEE OR THE STATE CENTRAL
COMMITTEE OF THE POLITICAL PARTY; AND

HOUSE BILL 333 3
(II) REMAIN POSTED ONLINE UNTIL AT LEAST 30 DAYS AFTER
THE CENTRAL COMMITTEE VOTES ON AN INDIVIDUAL TO FILL THE VACANCY.
(2) THE CENTRAL COMMITTEE MAY REDACT PERSONAL
INFORMATION FROM THE APPLICATIONS POSTED ONLINE UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(D) THE CENTRAL COMMITTEE SHALL HOLD A PUBLIC MEETING TO
INTERVIEW THE INDIVIDUALS WHO APPLIED TO FILL THE VACANCY.
(E) A MEETING HELD BY A CENTRAL COMMITTEE TO DISCUSS OR VOTE ON
FILLING A VACANCY SHALL BE:
(1) OPEN TO THE PUBLIC; AND
(2) ANNOUNCED AT LEAST 3 DAYS BEFORE THE MEETING.
(F) (1) THE VOTE BY A CENTRAL COMMITTEE TO CHOOSE AN INDIVIDUAL
TO FILL A VACANCY SHALL BE:
(I) BY ROLL CALL VOTE OR BY SIGNED BALLOTS; AND
(II) IN A MEETING OPEN TO THE PUBLIC.
(2) A MEMBER OF THE CENTRAL COMMITTEE WHO HAS APPLIED TO
FILL THE VACANCY SHALL RECUSE THEMSELVES FROM:
(I) ADMINISTERING THE PROCESS OF FILLING THE VACANCY,
INCLUDING ADVERTISING THE VACANCY, REVIEWING APPLICATIONS, AND
INTERVIEWING CANDIDATES; AND
(II) VOTING ON THE INDIVIDUAL TO FILL THE VACANCY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.